apertium_magahi_in_canonical_form.dix
<pardef n="s/Uwa__v">
    <e><p><l>Uwa</l><r>Uwa<s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="tam:adv_Uwa"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>Uwa</l><r>Uwa<s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="tam:adj_Uwa"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>Uwa</l><r>Uwa<s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>uwa_hi</l><r>Uwa<s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="tam:uwa_hi"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>uwa_he</l><r>Uwa<s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="tam:uwa_he"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>uwa_he</l><r>Uwa<s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="tam:uwa_he"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>uwa_hai</l><r>Uwa<s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="tam:uwa_hai"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>uwa_hai</l><r>Uwa<s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="tam:uwa_hai"/></r></p></e>

    <e><p><l>uwa_ha</l><r>Uwa<s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="tam:adv_uwa_ha"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>uwa_ha</l><r>Uwa<s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="tam:adv_uwa_ha"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>uwa_haWina</l><r>Uwa<s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="tam:uwa_haWina"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>uwa_haWina</l><r>Uwa<s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="tam:uwa_haWina"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>uwa_haWina</l><r>Uwa<s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="per:a_h2"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="tam:uwa_haWina"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>uwa_haWina</l><r>Uwa<s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="per:a_h2"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="tam:uwa_haWina"/></r></p></e>
    
    <e><p><l>uwiwa</l><r>Uwa<s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="tam:adj_uwiwa"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>uwiwa_hi</l><r>Uwa<s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="tam:uwiwa_hi"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>uwiwa_he</l><r>Uwa<s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="tam:uwiwa_he"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>uwiwa_he</l><r>Uwa<s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="tam:uwiwa_he"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>uwiwa_hai</l><r>Uwa<s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="tam:uwiwa_hai"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>uwiwa_hai</l><r>Uwa<s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="tam:uwiwa_hai"/></r></p></e>

    <e><p><l>uwiwa_ha</l><r>Uwa<s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="tam:uwiwa_ha"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>uwiwa_ha</l><r>Uwa<s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="tam:uwiwa_ha"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>uwiwa_haWina</l><r>Uwa<s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="tam:uwiwa_haWina"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>uwiwa_haWina</l><r>Uwa<s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="tam:uwiwa_haWina"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>uwiwa_haWina</l><r>Uwa<s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="per:a_h2"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="tam:uwiwa_haWina"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>uwiwa_haWina</l><r>Uwa<s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="per:a_h2"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="tam:uwiwa_haWina"/></r></p></e>

    <e><p><l>uwa_leli</l><r>Uwa<s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="tam:uwa_leli"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>uwa_lele</l><r>Uwa<s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="tam:uwa_lele"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>uwa_lele</l><r>Uwa<s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="tam:uwa_lele"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>uwa_lela</l><r>Uwa<s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="tam:uwa_lela"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>uwa_lela</l><r>Uwa<s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="tam:uwa_lela"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>uwa_lelaWina</l><r>Uwa<s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="tam:uwa_lelaWina"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>uwa_lelaWina</l><r>Uwa<s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="tam:uwa_lelaWina"/></r></p></e>

    <e><p><l>uwa_lelai</l><r>Uwa<s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="tam:uwa_lelai"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>uwa_lelai</l><r>Uwa<s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="tam:uwa_lelai"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>uwa_lelaWina</l><r>Uwa<s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="per:a_h2"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="tam:uwa_lelaWina"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>uwa_lelaWina</l><r>Uwa<s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="per:a_h2"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="tam:uwa_lelaWina"/></r></p></e>

    <e><p><l>uwbai</l><r>Uwa<s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="tam:uwbai"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>uwama</l><r>Uwa<s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>uwabe</l><r>Uwa<s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>uwabe</l><r>Uwa<s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>uwabahU</l><r>Uwa<s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>uwabahU</l><r>Uwa<s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>uwaWina</l><r>Uwa<s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>uwaWina</l><r>Uwa<s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>uwawai</l><r>Uwa<s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>uwawai</l><r>Uwa<s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>uwawaWina</l><r>Uwa<s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="per:a_h2"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>uwawaWina</l><r>Uwa<s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="per:a_h2"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="s"><i>s</i><par n="s/Uwa__v"/></e>
